District of Columbia statutes.
16-1033

Civil liability.

A law enforcement officer shall not be civilly liable solely because he or she makes an arrest in good faith and without malice pursuant to this subchapter.

History

Apr. 30, 1991, D.C. Law 8-261, § 2(c)(2), 37 DCR 5001

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1033.